California statutes. Business and Professions Code
(E) For a Duplicate Type 78 in cities of less than 40,000, but more than 20,000 population: the fee through September 30, 2019, is four hundred thirteen dollars ($413) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is five hundred forty dollars ($540).

(F) For a Duplicate Type 78 in all other localities: the fee through September 30, 2019, is three hundred twenty-six dollars ($326) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is four hundred thirty dollars ($430).

(69) For a Type 79 - Certified farmers’ market: the fee through September 30, 2019, is fifty-eight dollars ($58) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one hundred ten dollars ($110).

(70) For a Type 80 - Special on-sale general; per room: the fee through September 30, 2019, is seventeen dollars ($17) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is twenty dollars ($20).

(71) For a Type 81 - Wine sales event permit: the fee through September 30, 2019, is fifty dollars ($50) and the fee on and after October
 1, 2019, is one hundred ten dollars ($110).

(72) For a Type 82 - Direct shipper permit: the fee through September 30, 2019, is ten dollars ($10) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is twenty-five dollars ($25).

(73) (A) For a Type 83 - On-sale general caterer’s permit in cities of 40,000 population or over: the fee through September 30, 2019, is nine hundred seventy-one dollars ($971) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one thousand one hundred ninety dollars ($1,190).

(B) For a Type 83 - On-sale general caterer’s permit in cities of less than 40,000, but more than 20,000 population: the fee through September 30, 2019, is seven hundred eleven dollars ($711) and the fee on and after October
 1, 2019, is nine hundred seventy dollars ($970).

(C) For a Type 83 - On-sale general caterer’s permit in all other localities: the fee through September 30, 2019, is six hundred thirty-two dollars ($632) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is seven hundred fifty-five dollars ($755).

(74) For a Type 84 - Certified farmers’ market beer: the fee through September 30, 2019, is fifty-eight dollars ($58) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one hundred ten dollars ($110).

(75) For a Type 85 - Limited off-sale wine license: the fee through September 30, 2019, is two hundred seventy-eight dollars ($278) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is three hundred eighty dollars ($380).

(76) For a Type 86 - Instructional tasting license: the fee through September 30, 2019, is three hundred dollars ($300) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is three hundred eighty dollars ($380).

(77) (A) For a Type 87 - Neighborhood restricted special on-sale in cities of 40,000 population or over: the fee through September 30, 2019, is nine hundred seventy-one dollars ($971) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one thousand one hundred ninety dollars ($1,190).

(B) For a Type 87 - Neighborhood restricted special on-sale in cities of less than 40,000, but more than 20,000 population: the fee through September 30, 2019, is seven hundred eleven dollars ($711) and the fee on and
 after October 1, 2019, is nine hundred seventy dollars ($970).

(C) For a Type 87 - Neighborhood restricted special on-sale in all other localities: the fee through September 30, 2019, is six hundred thirty-two dollars ($632) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is seven hundred fifty-five dollars ($755).

(D) For a Duplicate Type 87 in cities of 40,000 population or over: the fee through September 30, 2019, is six hundred ninety-nine dollars ($699) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is seven hundred fifty-five dollars ($755).

(E) For a Duplicate Type 87 in cities of less than 40,000, but more than 20,000 population: the fee through September 30, 2019, is four hundred thirteen dollars ($413) and the fee on and after October
 1, 2019, is five hundred forty dollars ($540).

(F) For a Duplicate Type 87 in all other localities: the fee through September 30, 2019, is three hundred twenty-six dollars ($326) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is four hundred thirty dollars ($430).

(78) (A) For a Type 88 - Special on-sale general license for historic cemetery in cities of 40,000 population or over: the fee through September 30, 2019, is nine hundred seventy-one dollars ($971) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is one thousand one hundred ninety dollars ($1,190).

(B) For a Type 88 - Special on-sale general license for historic cemetery in cities of less than 40,000, but more than 20,000 population: the fee through
 September 30, 2019, is seven hundred eleven dollars ($711) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is nine hundred seventy dollars ($970).

(C) For a Type 88 - Special on-sale general license for historic cemetery in all other localities: the fee through September 30, 2019, is six hundred thirty-two dollars ($632) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is seven hundred fifty-five dollars ($755).

(D) For a Duplicate Type 88 in cities of 40,000 population or over: the fee through September 30, 2019, is six hundred ninety-nine dollars ($699) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is seven hundred fifty-five dollars ($755).

(E) For a Duplicate Type 88 in cities of less than 40,000, but more than 20,000 population:
 the fee through September 30, 2019, is four hundred thirteen dollars ($413) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is five hundred forty dollars ($540).

(F) For a Duplicate Type 88 in all other localities: the fee through September 30, 2019, is three hundred twenty-six dollars ($326) and the fee on and after October 1, 2019, is four hundred thirty dollars ($430).

(79) For a Type 90 - Music venue license in cities of 40,000 population or over: the fee is one thousand one hundred ninety dollars ($1,190).

(80) For a Type 90 - Music venue license in cities of less than 40,000, but more than 20,000 population: the fee is nine hundred seventy dollars ($970).

(81) For a Type 90 - Music venue license in all other localities: the fee is seven hundred fifty-five dollars ($755).

(82) For a Type 91 - Beer caterer’s permit: the fee is two hundred seventy-five dollars ($275).

(83) For a Type 93 - Estate tasting event permit: the fee is two hundred dollars ($200).

(c) (1) In addition to the application fee for a new permanent license as specified in subdivision (a), an annual renewal fee, as set forth in subdivision (b), shall accompany the application. The application fee shall be
 nonrefundable up to the amount of the application fee in paragraph (1) of subdivision (a), as adjusted by subdivisions (d) and (e). The annual fee provided at the time of application shall allow the license to be active for one year from the date of issuance and shall be refundable only in the event that the license application is withdrawn or denied.

(2) If an application includes multiple new permanent licenses to be issued at the same premises, the application fee shall be required for only one of the applied-for licenses and an application fee shall not be charged for the remainder of the licenses. In situations involving different license types, the application fee to be paid shall be the highest such fee as specified in subdivision (a). If an application for a new permanent license is combined with an application for license transfer
 pursuant to Section 24072 at the same premises, only the transfer application fee or the new permanent license application fee shall be required, whichever is highest. Notwithstanding this provision, the annual renewal fee required pursuant to this subdivision shall be payable for each license.

(d) Beginning January 1, 2021, and each January 1 thereafter, the department may adjust each of the fees specified in this section by increasing each fee by an amount not to exceed the percentage that the California Consumer Price Index (California Department of Industrial Relations, Division of Labor Statistics and Research, All Items, Base Period 1982–84=100) for the preceding August 2019, and each August annually thereafter, has increased under the same index over the month of August 2018, which shall be the base period. The department shall
 not adjust fees pursuant to this section if the balance of the Alcohol Beverage Control Fund at the end of the prior fiscal year is greater than one-fourth of the department’s appropriation from the Alcohol Beverage Control Fund for the current fiscal year. No fee shall be decreased pursuant to this adjustment below the fee currently in effect on each December 31. If the accumulation of percentage increases is greater than 8 percent, the department shall not adjust fees without the Legislature’s approval through the budget process. In the event that this index is discontinued, the department shall consult with the Department of Finance to convert the increase calculations to an index then available. When approved by the Department of
 Finance, the new index shall replace the discontinued index.

(e) When fees are adjusted pursuant to subdivision (d), the department shall calculate the percentage increase as specified in that subdivision and shall apply this increase to each fee. The increase to each fee shall be rounded to the nearest whole five dollars ($5). The adjusted fee list, to be effective on January 1 of the upcoming year, shall be published by the department on its internet website and transmitted in writing to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee no later than January 10 of the year before it becomes effective. This adjustment of fees and publication of the adjusted fee list is not subject to the requirements of Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government
 Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2025, Ch. 562, Sec. 1.   (AB 720)   Effective January 1, 2026.)
-------------------------------------------

23320.4.

(a) (1) For the purpose of providing economic relief to licensees most severely impacted by the COVID-19 pandemic, the department may waive license renewal fees for licenses with expiration dates between March 1, 2021, and February 28, 2023, inclusive, as provided in this section.

(2) The waiver of license renewal fees shall apply only to the following license types that were active, as defined by the department in its guidelines, between March 1, 2020, and December 31, 2020, inclusive: 02, 23, 40, 41, 42, 47, 48, 49, 50, 51, 52, 57, 58, 59, 60, 61, 64, 68, 69, 71, 72, 74, 75, 76, 77, 78, 83, 86, 87, and 99. Waiver of license renewal fees for a Type 02 license under this section shall apply only to the fees charged pursuant to subparagraphs
 (A), (B), and (C) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 23320, using production volumes as reported pursuant to Section 23327 for the fiscal year ending on the same date of the expiring license. Type 02 license renewal fees charged pursuant to subparagraph (D), (E), (F), or (G) of paragraph (2) of subdivision (b) of Section 23320 shall not be eligible for a waiver under this section.

(b) (1) A licensee may request a fee waiver in the manner provided by the department and shall certify under penalty of perjury that they qualify for the fee waiver as provided. The request shall be complete and received by the department before the expiration of the license for which the waiver is requested, including any authorized extensions thereto.

(2) For licenses that expire during the first full three months following enactment of this section, the department may
 extend license renewal dates, not to exceed 60 days, as necessary to effectuate the intent of this section and to allow licensees a reasonable amount of time to request a fee waiver.

(3) If the licensee does not request the fee waiver in the manner prescribed in paragraph (1), the licensee shall not be eligible for a fee waiver and shall thereafter pay the license renewal fees, together with any penalties that may be applicable under Section 24048.

(4) The department shall not refund any license renewal fees paid before the enactment of this section or the submission of a waiver request by a licensee.

(c) (1) The department shall establish and publish on its internet website the requirements and guidelines for submitting a fee waiver request and the manner of certification.

(2) The requirements, guidelines, and the manner of certification for waivers under this section implemented by the department are exempt from the Administrative Procedure Act (Chapter 3.5 (commencing with Section 11340), Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 11370), Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 11400), and Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 11500) of Part 1 of Division 3 of Title 2 of the Government Code).

(d) For purposes of this section, “license renewal fees” means fees payable pursuant to Section 23320, and applicable surcharges collected with those fees in accordance with Sections 23053.5, 23083.5, and 23320.5.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 23320.3 by Stats. 2021, Ch. 11, Sec. 1.   (AB 83)   Effective March 17, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

23320.5.

(a) (1) In addition to the annual fees provided for in subdivision (b) of Section 23320, the department shall collect a surcharge of ten dollars ($10).

(2) This section shall not apply to the following licenses: out-of-state beer manufacturer certificate (Type 26), out-of-state distilled spirits shipper certificate (Type 28), winegrape grower storage (Type 29), special on-sale beer and wine symphony (Type 65), bed and breakfast inn (Type 67), wine sales event permit (Type 81), direct shipper permit (Type 82), event permit (Type 77), special on-sale general; per room (Type 80), on-sale general caterer’s (Type 83), certified farmers’ market beer (Type 84), limited off-sale wine license (Type 85), and instructional tasting license (Type
 86).

(b) (1) All money collected from the surcharge described in subdivision (a) shall be deposited in the Motor Vehicle Account in the State Transportation Fund, and shall be used for the Department of the California Highway Patrol’s Designated Driver Program, when appropriated to the Department of the California Highway Patrol for that purpose.

(2) The Department of California Highway Patrol shall prioritize the expenditure of funds received pursuant to this subdivision for the Designated Driver Program’s outreach and education activities in, and adjacent to, individual events or venues, including, but not limited to, stadiums, parks, entertainment complexes, and arenas.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 10.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

23320.6.

(a) The Wine Safety Fund is hereby created as a special fund in the State Treasury, in trust, to the State Department of Health Services for the purpose of providing funds to better enable its Food and Drug Branch to carry out and supervise a statistically valid testing program to ensure that levels of lead in wine sold in this state remain safe and within tolerances established by applicable laws and regulations, for the health and safety of the consuming public upon appropriation by the Legislature in the annual Budget Act. The fees
 collected pursuant to Section 23320.7 shall be sufficient to cover, but shall not exceed, the costs of administering the testing program, including the reimbursement of any importer or retailer for the wholesale cost of any wine tested, conducted pursuant to this section. All moneys collected under Section 23320.7, including any interest accrued thereon, shall be deposited in the Wine Safety Fund.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature to appropriate moneys in the Wine Safety Fund in equal amounts of fifty-five thousand three hundred dollars ($55,300) over five years to the State Department of Health Services for expenditure exclusively for the purposes set forth in subdivision (a).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 288, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

23321.

The license for trains shall be issued to a railroad company or other person selling distilled spirits on board trains operating in this State, and a duplicate thereof shall be obtained for each train on which distilled spirits are sold. The license for cars of sleeping car companies shall be issued to a sleeping car company operating sleeping cars in this State, and a duplicate thereof shall be obtained for each train in which distilled spirits are sold by such companies. The license for airplanes shall be issued to an air common carrier selling distilled spirits on board airplanes operating in this State, and a duplicate thereof shall be obtained for each scheduled flight
 on which distilled spirits are sold.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 1221.)
-------------------------------------------

23321.6.

The license for vessels of more than 1,000 tons burden engaged in interstate and foreign commerce shall be issued to a common carrier by water selling distilled spirits on board vessels operating in this State, and a duplicate thereof shall be obtained for each vessel on which distilled spirits are sold.

(History: Added by Stats. 1959, Ch. 2192.)
-------------------------------------------

23321.7.

(a) The on-sale general bona fide public eating place intermittent dockside license for vessels of more than 7,000 tons displacement may be issued for any vessel of more than 7,000 tons displacement with cabin berth capacity for at least 75 passengers. Each license issuable under this section shall be used only in the county where issued, but a vessel qualified under this section may be issued such a license in more than one county. Notwithstanding the provisions of Section 23397, the licensee under each such license shall be authorized to sell alcoholic beverages to the general public aboard the vessel respecting which the license is issued when the vessel is securely lashed on berth in the county for which the license is issued, provided that such sales are incidental to the passenger
 operations of such vessel and beverages are purchased from persons licensed to sell alcoholic beverages for resale in this state. In no event shall the rights under any such license be exercised in any county during more than 100 calendar days in any calendar year.

 (b) Notwithstanding the provisions of Article 2 (commencing with Section 23815) of Chapter 5 of this division, there shall not be a limitation, other than provided in this section, on the number of licenses that may be issued under this section to applicants who meet its requirements. Except as otherwise specifically provided in this section, all provisions of this division shall apply to any license issued under this section in the same manner as such provisions apply to an on-sale general license issued for a bona fide public eating place, provided that a caterer’s permit shall not be issued pursuant to Section 23399 with respect to any license issued hereunder, and provided
 further that any duplicate license issued pursuant to Section 24042 respecting such vessel shall bear the same fee as an on-sale general dockside license (Type 62) specified by subdivision (b) of Section 23320.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 11.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

23325.

When the fee for any license is graduated according to the amount of alcoholic beverages produced under the license, the license fee shall be determined solely upon the gallonage produced, even though the license is applied for after the beginning of the license year.

(History: Added by Stats. 1953, Ch. 152.)
-------------------------------------------

23327.

(a) Persons holding wine growers’ licenses shall report annually at the end of each fiscal year, at the time and in the manner as the department may prescribe, the amount of wine produced by them during the fiscal year.

(b) If the total amount of wine produced during the year exceeds the amount permitted annually by the annual license fee already paid the department, the licensee shall pay such additional license fee as may be unpaid in accordance with the schedule provided in subdivision (b) of Section 23320.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 12.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

23328.

If a licensee neglects or refuses to make a report as required by Section 23327, the department shall make an estimate based upon any information in its possession, or that may come into its possession, of the amount of wine produced by the delinquent licensee for the periods with respect to which he failed to make a report and, upon the basis of the estimated amount, compute and assess the additional license fees payable by the delinquent licensee. An assessment may be made of the amount of license fees due for more than one period. The department shall give the delinquent licensee written notice of the estimated license fee.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 831.)
-------------------------------------------

23329.

If the department is not satisfied with a report required to be filed by Section 23327, it may make an additional assessment of license fees due based upon the facts contained in the report or upon any information within its possession, or that comes into its possession. An additional assessment may be made of the license fees for more than one period. In making an additional assessment the department may offset overpayments for periods against underpayments for other periods. The department shall give the licensee written notice of the additional assessment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1971, Ch. 831.)
-------------------------------------------

23330.

Any licensee against whom an assessment is made by the department pursuant to Section 23328 or 23329 may petition for reassessment within 15 days after service upon the licensee of notice of the assessment. If a petition for reassessment is not filed within the 15-day period, the amount of the assessment becomes final at the expiration thereof.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 447.)
-------------------------------------------

23331.

If a petition for reassessment is filed within 15 days, the department shall reconsider the assessment and, if the licensee has so requested in his petition, shall grant the licensee an oral hearing and give the licensee 10 days’ notice of the time and place of hearing. The department may continue the hearing from time to time as may be necessary. The department may decrease or increase the amount of the assessment. The amount of the assessment may be increased, however, only if a claim for the increase is asserted by the department at or before the hearing.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 447.)
-------------------------------------------

23332.

The order or decision of the department upon a petition for reassessment becomes final upon service upon the licensee of notice of the order or decision. All assessments made by the department in regard to license fees become due and payable at the time they become final.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1955, Ch. 447.)
-------------------------------------------

23334.

On- or off-sale general licensees shall keep books of accounts in which shall be kept records of all distilled spirits acquired by them, or in lieu thereof shall preserve all original bills and invoices for distilled spirits acquired. The records shall be in the form prescribed by the department and shall show at all times all purchases of distilled spirits made during the previous three years.

(History: Added by renumbering Section 23333 by Stats. 1957, Ch. 37.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. Rights and Obligations of Licensees [23355. - 23405.4.]

23355.

Except as otherwise provided in this division and subject to the provisions of Section 22 of Article XX of the Constitution, the licenses provided for in Article 2 of this chapter authorize the person to whom issued to exercise the rights and privileges specified in this article and no others at the premises for which issued during the year for which issued.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1974, Ch. 823.)
-------------------------------------------

23355.1.

Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, the following acts are authorized:

(a) Deliveries of distilled spirits by a licensee to a retail licensee may be made from the vendor’s licensed premises or from a warehouse located within the county in which the vendor’s licensed premises are located except as permitted by Section 23383. Deliveries to a licensed importer may also be made from any point outside the state.

(b) A
 distilled spirits manufacturer, distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent, distilled spirits rectifier general, or rectifier may store, bottle, cut, blend, mix, flavor, color, label, and package distilled spirits owned by another distilled spirits manufacturer, distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent, distilled spirits rectifier general, rectifier, or a distilled spirits wholesaler, and may deliver those distilled spirits from the premises where stored, bottled, cut, blended, mixed, flavored, colored, labeled, or packaged, or from a warehouse located in the same county as that premises for the account of the owner of those distilled spirits to any licensee that owner would be authorized to deliver to under his or her own license, except to a retail licensee.

(c) A distilled spirits manufacturer, distilled spirits manufacturer’s agent, distilled spirits rectifier general, rectifier, or distilled spirits wholesaler may store and deliver distilled
 spirits for the account of another licensee who would be authorized to make the delivery under his or her own license, except that licensee shall not make a delivery to a retail licensee on behalf of another licensee.

(d) A retail off-sale licensee with annual United States auction sales revenues of at least five hundred million dollars ($500,000,000) or annual wine auction sales revenues of at least five million dollars ($5,000,000), may sell wine consigned by any person, whether or not the auctioned wine is “vintage wine” as defined in Section 23104.6, at any auction held in compliance with Section 2328 of the Commercial Code to consumers and retail licensees and may deliver wines sold to any purchaser at that auction from the vendor’s licensed premises or from any other storage facility.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1999, Ch. 699, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2000.)
-------------------------------------------

23355.2.

(a) For purposes of this section, “controlled access alcoholic beverage cabinet” means a closed container, either refrigerated, in whole or in part, or nonrefrigerated, and access to the interior of which is (1) restricted by means of a locking device which requires the use of a key, magnetic card, or similar device, or (2) controlled at all times by the licensee.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, a hotel or motel having an on-sale license may sell alcoholic beverages to its registered guests by means of a controlled access alcoholic beverage cabinet located in the guestrooms of those registered guests, provided that each of the following conditions is met:

(1) Access to a controlled access alcoholic beverage cabinet in a particular guestroom is provided, whether by furnishing a key, magnetic card, or similar device, or otherwise, only to the adult registered guest, if any, registered to stay in the guestroom.

(2) Prior to providing a key, magnetic card, or other similar device required to attain access to the controlled access alcoholic beverage cabinet in a particular guestroom to the registered guest thereof, or prior to otherwise providing access thereto to the registered guest, the licensee shall verify, in accordance with Article 3 (commencing with Section 25657), of Chapter 16 of this division, that each registered guest to whom a key, magnetic card, or similar device is provided, or to whom access is otherwise provided, is not a minor.

(3) All employees handling the
 alcoholic beverages to be placed in the controlled access alcoholic beverage cabinet in any guestroom, including, but not limited to, any employee who inventories or restocks and replenishes the alcoholic beverages in the controlled access alcoholic beverage cabinet, shall be at least 21 years of age.

(4) There is no replenishing or restocking of the alcoholic beverages in any controlled access alcoholic beverage cabinet between the hours of 2 a.m. and 6 a.m. of the same day.

(c) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, a hotel or motel having an on-sale general license or an on-sale general license for restricted service lodging establishments may, upon issuance of a permit from the department, sell from its controlled access alcoholic beverage cabinets distilled spirits in containers of 50 milliliters or less, or in containers of comparable size.

(d) Notwithstanding any other provision of this division, a hotel or motel having an on-sale general license or an on-sale general license for restricted service lodging establishments and an off-sale general license may sell from its controlled access alcoholic beverage cabinets distilled spirits in containers of 50 milliliters or less, or in containers of comparable size, without having to obtain the permit specified in subdivision (c).

(e) A controlled access alcoholic beverage cabinet may be part of another cabinet or similar device, whether refrigerated, in whole or in part, or nonrefrigerated, from which nonalcoholic beverages or food may be purchased by the guests in hotel or motel guestrooms. However, in that event, the portion of the cabinet or similar device in which alcoholic beverages are stored shall be a controlled access alcoholic beverage cabinet, as defined in this
 section.

(f) For purposes of this section, “hotel” or “motel” shall mean an establishment which is licensed to sell alcoholic beverages and which contains guestroom accommodations with respect to which the predominant relationship existing between the occupants thereof and the owner or operator of the establishment is that of innkeeper and guest. For purposes of this subdivision, the existence of other legal relationships as between some occupants and the owner or operator thereof shall be immaterial.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 29, Sec. 13.   (SB 82)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

23355.3.

(a) A licensee may sponsor or otherwise participate in an event conducted by, and for the benefit of, a nonprofit organization in which retail and nonretail licensees are involved as sponsors or participants, subject to all of the following conditions:

(1) Except as otherwise provided in this section, any payment of money or other
 consideration for sponsorship or participation in the event shall be made only to the nonprofit organization conducting the event.

(2) Except as otherwise provided in this section, a nonretail licensee shall not, directly or indirectly, pay money or provide any other thing of value to a permanent retail licensee that is also a sponsor of, or participant in, the event.

(3) A nonretail licensee may donate alcoholic beverages to a nonprofit only as otherwise authorized by Section 25503.9.

(4) Except as otherwise provided by this division, a retail licensee shall not give, sell, or furnish any alcoholic beverages to the temporary licensee.

(5) A nonretail or retail licensee may choose to participate in any level of sponsorship, including at the name or
 principal sponsor level. A nonprofit organization may choose to have one, or multiple, name or principal sponsors.

(6) (A) A nonretail licensee may advertise or communicate sponsorship or participation in the event. This advertising or communication may include, but is not limited to, sharing, reposting, or otherwise forwarding a social media post by a permanent retail licensee or a nonretail licensee if the advertisement or communication does not contain the retail price of any alcoholic beverage or otherwise promotes a retail licensee beyond its sponsorship or participation in the event.

(B) A nonretail licensee shall not pay or reimburse a permanent licensee, directly or indirectly, for any advertising services, including by way of social media. Except as otherwise permitted by this section, a permanent retail licensee shall not accept any payment or
 reimbursement, directly or indirectly, for any advertising services offered by a nonretail licensee.

(C) For the purposes of this subdivision, “social media” means a service, platform, application, or site where users communicate and share media, such as pictures, videos, music, and blogs, with other users.

(7) A nonretail licensee shall not require, directly or indirectly, as a condition of sponsorship or participation in any event under this section, that its products be sold or served exclusively at the event. A nonretail licensee shall not receive, directly or indirectly, any advertising, sale, or promotional benefit from any permanent retail licensee in connection with the sponsorship or participation. A permanent retail licensee shall not offer or provide a nonretail licensee any advertising, sale, or promotional benefit in connection with the sponsorship or
 participation.

(b) This section does not authorize a nonretail licensee to pay, in whole or in part, any costs, including the cost of sponsorship, of any retail licensee that is sponsoring or participating in a nonprofit event.

(c) A licensee that sponsors or participates in a nonprofit event under this section shall keep detailed records of its sponsorship or participation and shall maintain those records for a period of at least three years. These records shall be provided to the department upon request.

(d) Nothing in this section shall be deemed to exempt the nonprofit organization from obtaining any licenses or permits as may be required to conduct the event.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 423, Sec. 1.   (AB 2913)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

23356.

Any manufacturer’s or winegrower’s license authorizes the person to whom it is issued to become a manufacturer or producer of the alcoholic beverage specified in the license, and to do any of the following:

(a) Whether manufactured or produced by him or her or any other person, to package, rectify, mix, flavor, color, label, and export the alcoholic beverage specified in the license.

(b) To sell only those alcoholic beverages as are
 packaged by or for him or her only to persons holding wholesaler’s, manufacturer’s, winegrower’s, manufacturer’s agent’s, or rectifier’s licenses authorizing the sale of those alcoholic beverages and to persons who take delivery of those alcoholic beverages within this state for delivery or use without the state.

(c) To deal in warehouse receipts for the alcoholic beverage specified in the license.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2004, Ch. 437, Sec. 3.   Effective September 9, 2004.)
-------------------------------------------

23356.1.

(a) A winegrower’s license also authorizes the person to whom issued to conduct winetastings of wine produced or bottled by, or produced and packaged for, the licensee, either on or off the winegrower’s premises. When a winetasting is held off the winegrower’s premises at an event sponsored by a private nonprofit organization, no wine may be sold, and no sales or orders solicited, except that orders for the sale of wine may be accepted by the winegrower if the sales transaction is completed at the winegrower’s premises. For purposes of this
 subdivision, “private nonprofit organization” means an organization described in Section 23701a, 23701b, 23701d, 23701e, 23701f, 23701g, 23701i, 23701k, 23701l, 23701r, or 23701w of the Revenue and Taxation Code.

(b) Notwithstanding any other provisions of this division, a winegrower who, prior to July 1, 1970, had, at his or her premises of production, sold to consumers for consumption off the premises domestic wine other than wine which was produced or bottled by, or produced and packaged for, the licensee, and which was not sold under a brand or trade name owned by the licensee, and who had, prior to July 1, 1970, conducted winetastings of the domestic wine at his or her licensed premises, is authorized to continue to conduct the winetasting and selling activities at the licensed premises.

(c) A winegrower who was licensed as such prior to July 1, 1954, and who prior to
 July 1, 1970, had, at his or her licensed premises, sold to consumers for consumption off the premises, wine packaged for and imported by him or her, and who conducted winetastings of the wines at his or her licensed premises, may continue to conduct the winetasting and selling activities at the licensed premises.

(d) The department may adopt the rules as it determines to be necessary for the administration of this section.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2007, Ch. 246, Sec. 1.   Effective January 1, 2008.)
-------------------------------------------

23356.2.

(a) No license or permit shall be required for the manufacture of beer or wine for personal or family use, and not for sale, by a person over 21 years of age. The aggregate amount of beer or wine with respect to any household shall not exceed (1) 100 gallons per calendar year if there is only one adult in the household or (2) 200 gallons per calendar year if there are two or more adults in the
 household.

(b) Beer or wine produced pursuant to this section may be removed from the premises where made only under any of the following circumstances:

(1) For use, including in a bona fide competition or judging or a bona fide exhibition or tasting.

(2) For personal or family use.

(3) When donated to a nonprofit organization for use as provided in subdivision (c) or (d).

(4) Beer or wine produced pursuant to this section may only be provided or served to the public pursuant to paragraphs (1) and (3) within a clearly identified area, that includes, but is not limited to, a physical barrier with a monitored point of entry. Beer or wine produced by a beer manufacturer or winegrower as
 defined in Sections 23012 and 23013, respectively, and licensed by the department, shall not be provided or served to the public within this area.

(5) (A) Beer produced pursuant to this section may be removed from the premises where made in connection with a homebrewers club meeting or bona fide home brewed beer competition that is held on the premises of an authorized licensee. Homebrewers may exchange containers of home brewed beer during the club meeting or bona fide home brewed beer competition. Home brewed beer made by the club members may be consumed by club members while on the licensed premises during the club meeting or by competition organizers, competition judges, and competition stewards on licensed premises during a bona fide home brewed beer competition. Patrons of the authorized licensee that are not club members, competition organizers, competition judges, or competition stewards shall not consume any home
 brewed beer.

(B) The authorized licensee shall designate, by signage or other item, which tables within the licensed premises shall be used by club members during the club meeting or bona fide home brewed beer competition.
